Wyoming, session 2026, HB0108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-507 by creating a new subsection
(o) is amended to read:

9-1-507. Examination of books of state institutions,
agencies and certain districts and entities; independent
audit authorized; guidelines.

HB0108

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0360
(o) The director of the state department of audit
shall post the following reports and information on the
department's official website not later than the dates
specified in this subsection:

(i) Reports filed by counties, cities, towns,
special districts and other entities submitted under
paragraph (a)(vii) of this section, which shall be posted
on the department's website not later than December 31 of
each year;

(ii) Budgets submitted by special districts and
other entities under paragraph (a)(viii) of this section,
which shall be posted on the department's website not later
than thirty (30) days after the budgets are due to the
department under paragraph (a)(viii) of this section;

(iii) Budgets filed by special districts under
W.S. 16-12-408(a), which shall be posted on the
department's website not later than thirty (30) days after
the budgets are due to the department under W.S.
16-12-408(a);

HB0108

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0360
(iv) Annual audits submitted under W.S.
9-1-507(a)(iii)(A) and (a)(ix)(A) and 16-4-121(e) and (f),
which shall be posted on the department's website not later
than thirty (30) days after the annual audits are due to
the department under W.S. 16-4-121.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0108